Massachusetts, session 194th, H366.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 23 of chapter 138 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after the
final paragraph, the following new paragraph:-
The in-store sale of alcoholic beverages by a licensee engaged in the sale of alcoholic
beverages as so authorized under the provisions of this section shall be conducted through a face-
to-face transaction between the customer and the licensee or between the customer and an
authorized employee of the licensee who has attained the age of 18 years. In-store automated or
self-checkout sales of alcoholic beverages by such licensees shall be prohibited.
of 1